Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,131
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Scandals are rampant throughout college football as evidenced by schools placed on probation by the National Collegiate Athletic Association, coaches dismissed or forced to resign for improprieties, and players being declared ineligible to compete for violating rules against receiving fair financial compensation;

(2) Many players are recruited from impoverished families and the rules of the National Collegiate Athletic Association prohibiting reasonable financial compensation render such players vulnerable to inducements, benefits, and other types of compensation which are defined as illicit by the National Collegiate Athletic Association rules;

(3) A fair rate of financial compensation would give players a choice when offered illicit inducements, compensation, or assistance;

(4) Rules of the National Collegiate Athletic Association prohibiting compensation are unduly restrictive and unreasonable, promote unfairness, encourage dishonesty in recruiting and retaining players, and would not be tolerated if applied to all students; and

(5) Players at United States service academies are compensated while in attendance and are eligible to compete against schools which are members of the National Collegiate Athletic Association.

Laws 2003, LB 688, § 1.
For the operative date for this section, see section 85-1,136.